Utah statutes.
78A-2-208.   Sittings of courts -- To be public -- Right to exclude in certain cases.

(1)  The sittings of every court of justice are public, except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3).

(2)  The court may, in its discretion, during the examination of a witness exclude any and all other witnesses in the proceedings.

(3)  In an action of divorce, criminal conversation, seduction, abortion, rape, or assault with intent to commit rape, the court may, in its discretion, exclude all persons who do not have a direct interest in the proceedings, except jurors, witnesses and officers of the court.

